District of Columbia statutes.
31-4201

Short title; applicability of provisions.

This subdivision shall be known as the “Life Insurance Act.” All life insurance companies now or hereafter incorporated or formed by authority of any general or special law of this District or by other act of Congress, and all foreign and alien companies authorized to do business in this District, shall be subject to said chapters.

June 19, 1934, 48 Stat. 1127, ch. 672, ch. I, § 1
1973 Ed., § 35-301.
1981 Ed., § 35-301.
Hospital and medical services corporations, applicability of this section, see § 31-3503.
Application of chapter to existing companies, see § 31-4420.